Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.450

Multistate license.

A person seeking to practice as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse in this state may choose to apply for a license issued under this chapter or a multistate license issued under chapter 18.80 RCW.

[ 2023 c 123 s 15.]

NOTES:

Short title—2023 c 123: See RCW 18.80.900.